Washington statutes.
RCW 36.12.020

Requisites of petition—Submission to electors.

If the petition is signed by qualified voters of the county equal in number to at least one-third of all the votes cast in the county at the last preceding general election the board must, at the next general election of county officers, submit the question of removal to the electors of the county.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.12.020. Prior: 1890 p 318 s 2; RRS s 3999.]